North Dakota, session 69, SB2320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-06-17.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-06-17.1. Carbon dioxide pipeline exemption - Exception .
PropertySubject to the limitations in this section, property, not including land, is exempt from
taxation during construction and for the first ten full taxable years following initial operation if it
consists of a pipeline, constructed after 1996, and necessary associated equipment for the
transportation or storage of carbon dioxide for secure geologic storage or use in enhanced
recovery of oil or natural gas. The exemption under this section does not apply to an interstate
pipeline and necessary associated equipment for the transportation of carbon dioxide into the
state for secure geologic storage or use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 1 25.0972.01000